lexc/verb/enhuigeoik.lexc
LEXICON Case
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeoe§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeoe§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeoe§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeoe§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeoe§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igea§t§igeoe§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igea§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaa§t§igeoe§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaa§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattetoe§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeoe§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeoe§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né


LEXICON Case1
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§igeo§l #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^ik           #;    !
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    ! franciáz
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeo§n     #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^jék     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igea§t§igeoe§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igea§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaa§t§igeoe§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaa§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeoe§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeoe§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON AddVerbgt
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Casegt;

LEXICON Casegt
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^ök    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^tök  #;    ! tek/tok


LEXICON AddVerboe
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repoe;

LEXICON Repoe
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo§g§AA§t  Imperoe;
                    Imper1oe;

LEXICON Imperoe
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrepoe;
                      Nrepoe2;
LEXICON Imper1oe
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrepoe; ! §tatt§
                      Nrep1oe;

LEXICON Nrepoe
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperoe;
                      NImperoe2;
LEXICON Nrepoe2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImperoe;
                      NImperoe2;

LEXICON Verb
blődködik:blődköd AddVerboe;
büdösködik:büdösköd AddVerboe;
bütykösködik:bütykösköd AddVerboe;
bőrösödik:bőrösöd AddVerboe;
bűnösködik:bűnösköd AddVerboe;
cihelődik:cihelőd AddVerboe;
csipkelődik:csipkelőd AddVerboe;
csévélődik:csévélőd AddVerboe;
csökönyösködik:csökönyösköd AddVerboe;
csücsörödik:csücsöröd AddVerboe;
célravezetődik:célravezetőd AddVerboe;
dezaktiválódik:dezaktiválód AddVerboe;
didergősödik:didergősöd AddVerboe;
dölyfösködik:dölyfösköd AddVerboe;
dörgölődik:dörgölőd AddVerboe;
dühödik:dühöd AddVerboe;
dühösödik:dühösöd AddVerboe;
edzősködik:edzősköd AddVerboe;
egyszerűsödik:egyszerűsöd AddVerboe;
ejtődik:ejtőd AddVerboe;
elégítődik:elégítőd AddVerboe;
előnyösödik:előnyösöd AddVerboe;
említődik:említőd AddVerboe;
engesztelődik:engesztelőd AddVerboe;
erőlködik:erőlköd AddVerboe;
erősködik:erősköd AddVerboe;
esküdik:esküd AddVerboe;
eszelősödik:eszelősöd AddVerboe;
fedődik:fedőd AddVerboe;
fejeződik:fejeződ AddVerboe;
fejtődik:fejtőd AddVerboe;
feleződik:feleződ AddVerboe;
fellengzősködik:fellengzősköd AddVerboe;
fertőződik:fertőződ AddVerboe;
festődik:festőd AddVerboe;
flektálódik:flektálód AddVerboe;
fészkelődik:fészkelőd AddVerboe;
fölösödik:fölösöd AddVerboe;
fürtösödik:fürtösöd AddVerboe;
füstösödik:füstösöd AddVerboe;
gombostűzik:gombostűz AddVerbgt;
gyönyörködik:gyönyörköd AddVerboe;
győzködik:győzköd AddVerboe;
gyűlölködik:gyűlölköd AddVerboe;
gyűrűsödik:gyűrűsöd AddVerboe;
gömbölyödik:gömbölyöd AddVerboe;
göndörödik:göndöröd AddVerboe;
görcsölődik:görcsölőd AddVerboe;
göthösködik:göthösköd AddVerboe;
gőgösködik:gőgösköd AddVerboe;
határőrködik:határőrköd AddVerboe; !igeoik
heccelődik:heccelőd AddVerboe;
helyeződik:helyeződ AddVerboe;
hólyagzódik:hólyagzód AddVerboe;
hősködik:hősköd AddVerboe;
idegződik:idegződ AddVerboe;
idősködik:idősköd AddVerboe;
illesztődik:illesztőd AddVerboe;
ingerlődik:ingerlőd AddVerboe;
kelteződik:kelteződ AddVerboe;
kezdődik:kezdőd AddVerboe;
korszerűsödik:korszerűsöd AddVerboe;
kérdezősködik:kérdezősköd AddVerboe;
kétszínűsködik:kétszínűsköd AddVerboe;
könnyelműsködik:könnyelműsköd AddVerboe;
köszörülődik:köszörülőd AddVerboe;
kötődik:kötőd AddVerboe;
közönyösödik:közönyösöd AddVerboe;
küszködik:küszköd AddVerboe;
lepődik:lepőd AddVerboe;
léptetődik:léptetőd AddVerboe;
metsződik:metsződ AddVerboe;
mérgeződik:mérgeződ AddVerboe;
művelődik:művelőd AddVerboe;
nevelősködik:nevelősköd AddVerboe;
nyűgölődik:nyűgölőd AddVerboe;
nézelődik:nézelőd AddVerboe;
pazarlódik:pazarlód AddVerboe;
piperkőcködik:piperkőcköd AddVerboe;
pödrődik:pödrőd AddVerboe;
pörösködik:pörösköd AddVerboe;
rejtőzködik:rejtőzköd AddVerboe;
reteszelődik:reteszelőd AddVerboe;
rétegződik:rétegződ AddVerboe;
rücskösödik:rücskösöd AddVerboe;
sietősödik:sietősöd AddVerboe;
szedelőzködik:szedelőzköd AddVerboe;
szellősödik:szellősöd AddVerboe;
szennyeződik:szennyeződ AddVerboe;
szerződik:szerződ AddVerboe;
szájhősködik:szájhősköd AddVerboe;
szörnyülködik:szörnyülköd AddVerboe;
szűkölködik:szűkölköd AddVerboe;
sértődik:sértőd AddVerboe;
sürgölődik:sürgölőd AddVerboe;
tehetősödik:tehetősöd AddVerboe;
tengődik:tengőd AddVerboe;
terjengősödik:terjengősöd AddVerboe;
tesztelődik:tesztelőd AddVerboe;
tolerálhatódik:tolerálhatód AddVerboe;
tízszereződik:tízszereződ AddVerboe;
tömörödik:tömöröd AddVerboe;
töpörödik:töpöröd AddVerboe;
törökösödik:törökösöd AddVerboe;
tütüsödik:tütüsöd AddVerboe;
tűrődik:tűrőd AddVerboe;
verődik:verőd AddVerboe;
vesződik:vesződ AddVerboe;
vezérlődik:vezérlőd AddVerboe;
vásárlódik:vásárlód AddVerboe;
vörösödik:vörösöd AddVerboe;
zörgölődik:zörgölőd AddVerboe;
élcelődik:élcelőd AddVerboe;
érlelődik:érlelőd AddVerboe;
értékelődik:értékelőd AddVerboe;
ésszerűsködik:ésszerűsköd AddVerboe;
évődik:évőd AddVerboe;
öklösödik:öklösöd AddVerboe;
önfejűsködik:önfejűsköd AddVerboe;
önszabályozódik:önszabályozód AddVerboe;
önzősködik:önzősköd AddVerboe;
összegződik:összegződ AddVerboe;
üdvösödik:üdvösöd AddVerboe;
ütődik:ütőd AddVerboe;
őrződik:őrződ AddVerboe;
LEXICON Verb1
kintfelejtődik:kintfelejtőd AddVerboe;
viszontgyűlölködik:viszontgyűlölköd AddVerboe;
